lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4880 Y 1
SFX 4880 0 necked .
SFX 1158 Y 1
SFX 1158 0 ium's .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 ' .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 . .
SFX 4124 Y 1
SFX 4124 0 hurst .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 a .
SFX 582 Y 1
SFX 582 0 b .
SFX 405 Y 1
SFX 405 0 c .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 d .
SFX 16 Y 1
SFX 16 0 e .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 f .
SFX 208 Y 1
SFX 208 0 g .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 h .
SFX 75 Y 1
SFX 75 0 i .
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 0 j .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 k .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 l .
SFX 290 Y 1
SFX 290 0 m .
SFX 27 Y 1
SFX 27 0 n .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 o .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 0 p .
SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 0 r .
SFX 2 Y 1
SFX 2 0 s .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 t .
SFX 1045 Y 1
SFX 1045 0 u .
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 0 v .
SFX 1185 Y 1
SFX 1185 0 w .
SFX 525 Y 1
SFX 525 0 x .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 y .
SFX 1109 Y 1
SFX 1109 0 z .
SFX 3410 Y 1
SFX 3410 0 handedly .
SFX 2449 Y 1
SFX 2449 0 kiness's .
SFX 4531 Y 1
SFX 4531 0 tatement's .
SFX 3931 Y 1
SFX 3931 0 nail .
SFX 3693 Y 1
SFX 3693 0 tanding .
SFX 3099 Y 1
SFX 3099 0 teens .
SFX 3635 Y 1
SFX 3635 0 ulator's .
SFX 4559 Y 1
SFX 4559 0 stations .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 0 name .
SFX 306 Y 1
SFX 306 0 ette's .
SFX 3127 Y 1
SFX 3127 0 stan's .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 awing .
SFX 2237 Y 1
SFX 2237 0 efully .
SFX 4123 Y 1
SFX 4123 0 ialism .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 lating .
SFX 3402 Y 1
SFX 3402 0 ialist .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 am's .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 a's .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 urer's .
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 0 eman .
SFX 4021 Y 1
SFX 4021 0 lative .
SFX 1213 Y 1
SFX 1213 0 piece .
SFX 3420 Y 1
SFX 3420 0 glier .
SFX 3352 Y 1
SFX 3352 0 ister's .
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 ery's .
SFX 3941 Y 1
SFX 3941 0 mond .
SFX 2418 Y 1
SFX 2418 0 mont .
SFX 3831 Y 1
SFX 3831 0 pped .
SFX 3351 Y 1
SFX 3351 0 isters .
SFX 1799 Y 1
SFX 1799 0 bing's .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 utation .
SFX 3933 Y 1
SFX 3933 0 nah .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 nal .
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 0 nan .
SFX 1911 Y 1
SFX 1911 0 nas .
SFX 4206 Y 1
SFX 4206 0 emic .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 anists .
SFX 974 Y 1
SFX 974 0 boat's .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 nce .
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 0 giness's .
SFX 2290 Y 1
SFX 2290 0 ve's .
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 0 ncy .
SFX 3557 Y 1
SFX 3557 0 agers .
SFX 950 Y 1
SFX 950 0 more .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 nea .
SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 ned .
SFX 4878 Y 1
SFX 4878 0 nee .
SFX 1705 Y 1
SFX 1705 0 nel .
SFX 210 Y 1
SFX 210 0 ner .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 nes .
SFX 948 Y 1
SFX 948 0 net .
SFX 589 Y 1
SFX 589 0 ney .
SFX 996 Y 1
SFX 996 0 pered .
SFX 4874 Y 1
SFX 4874 0 nge .
SFX 2501 Y 1
SFX 2501 0 go's .
SFX 1902 Y 1
SFX 1902 0 ngs .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 nia .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 nic .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 nie .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 nis .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 land .
SFX 3334 Y 1
SFX 3334 0 lant .
SFX 1623 Y 1
SFX 1623 0 atives .
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 0 locked .
SFX 609 Y 1
SFX 609 0 piest .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 lard .
SFX 4727 Y 1
SFX 4727 0 rades .
SFX 2771 Y 1
SFX 2771 0 non .
SFX 3267 Y 1
SFX 3267 0 nor .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 late .
SFX 1673 Y 1
SFX 1673 0 row's .
SFX 2427 Y 1
SFX 2427 0 maids .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 rting .
SFX 652 Y 1
SFX 652 0 books .
SFX 4730 Y 1
SFX 4730 0 ractions .
SFX 3888 Y 1
SFX 3888 0 nus .
SFX 1895 Y 1
SFX 1895 0 nut .
SFX 3224 Y 1
SFX 3224 0 played .
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 0 titution's .
SFX 2451 Y 1
SFX 2451 0 jack .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 inesses .
SFX 2877 Y 1
SFX 2877 0 hoogte .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 rolled .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 rests .
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 0 udes .
SFX 2492 Y 1
SFX 2492 0 heartedly .
SFX 3603 Y 1
SFX 3603 0 vention's .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 ification .
SFX 4383 Y 1
SFX 4383 0 usnesses .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 try's .
SFX 3488 Y 1
SFX 3488 0 ectives .
SFX 2828 Y 1
SFX 2828 0 kinesses .
SFX 3014 Y 1
SFX 3014 0 é .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 smiths .
SFX 2855 Y 1
SFX 2855 0 ill's .
SFX 3270 Y 1
SFX 3270 0 nised .
SFX 2775 Y 1
SFX 2775 0 nises .
SFX 3261 Y 1
SFX 3261 0 ocation's .
SFX 4294 Y 1
SFX 4294 0 anting .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 rousness's .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 idness .
SFX 2981 Y 1
SFX 2981 0 -three .
SFX 1531 Y 1
SFX 1531 0 ss's .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 casts .
SFX 2184 Y 1
SFX 2184 0 key's .
SFX 2486 Y 1
SFX 2486 0 horns .
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 0 ace .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 ach .
SFX 2977 Y 1
SFX 2977 0 ack .
SFX 3365 Y 1
SFX 3365 0 inated .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 act .
SFX 3562 Y 1
SFX 3562 0 acy .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 0 inates .
SFX 620 Y 1
SFX 620 0 ifying .
SFX 3530 Y 1
SFX 3530 0 breaks .
SFX 3900 Y 1
SFX 3900 0 nisms .
SFX 62 Y 1
SFX 62 0 ions .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 age .
SFX 2266 Y 1
SFX 2266 0 ail .
SFX 1355 Y 1
SFX 1355 0 ain .
SFX 3554 Y 1
SFX 3554 0 air .
SFX 4537 Y 1
SFX 4537 0 taker's .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 re's .
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 0 ella's .
SFX 2461 Y 1
SFX 2461 0 iors .
SFX 2975 Y 1
SFX 2975 0 ake .
SFX 4225 Y 1
SFX 4225 0 dor's .
SFX 4144 Y 1
SFX 4144 0 girl's .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 co's .
SFX 3411 Y 1
SFX 3411 0 hall .
SFX 4055 Y 1
SFX 4055 0 itively .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 anders .
SFX 1164 Y 1
SFX 1164 0 hand .
SFX 2258 Y 1
SFX 2258 0 ase .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 tracting .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 ginesses .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 orous .
SFX 4185 Y 1
SFX 4185 0 erships .
SFX 1466 Y 1
SFX 1466 0 ifiers .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 aws .
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 0 goer .
SFX 3418 Y 1
SFX 3418 0 goes .
SFX 1351 Y 1
SFX 1351 0 ays .
SFX 1157 Y 1
SFX 1157 0 ivity's .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 rating .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 tituted .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 0 words .
SFX 4475 Y 1
SFX 4475 0 titutes .
SFX 4454 Y 1
SFX 4454 0 tractive .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 enings .
SFX 2875 Y 1
SFX 2875 0 hot's .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 ba .
SFX 2028 Y 1
SFX 2028 0 be .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 bi .
SFX 1497 Y 1
SFX 1497 0 bo .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 bs .
SFX 3387 Y 1
SFX 3387 0 icide .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 by .
SFX 3109 Y 1
SFX 3109 0 tated .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 tates .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 da .
SFX 913 Y 1
SFX 913 0 de .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 di .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 do .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 0 lying .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 ds .
SFX 307 Y 1
SFX 307 0 dy .
SFX 1980 Y 1
SFX 1980 0 face .
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 0 fs .
SFX 1594 Y 1
SFX 1594 0 fy .
SFX 3782 Y 1
SFX 3782 0 rowed .
SFX 3423 Y 1
SFX 3423 0 glass's .
SFX 1473 Y 1
SFX 1473 0 ha .
SFX 1090 Y 1
SFX 1090 0 he .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 alisations .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 hs .
SFX 3403 Y 1
SFX 3403 0 ht .
SFX 3815 Y 1
SFX 3815 0 rative .
SFX 3021 Y 1
SFX 3021 0 world .
SFX 1330 Y 1
SFX 1330 0 hy .
SFX 2630 Y 1
SFX 2630 0 tt's .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 0 la .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 0 ld .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 le .
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 0 li .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 ll .
SFX 1918 Y 1
SFX 1918 0 lo .
SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 ls .
SFX 5 Y 1
SFX 5 0 ly .
SFX 1313 Y 1
SFX 1313 0 lizations .
SFX 1525 Y 1
SFX 1525 0 tations .
SFX 3721 Y 1
SFX 3721 0 sse's .
SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 0 na .
SFX 949 Y 1
SFX 949 0 nd .
SFX 1756 Y 1
SFX 1756 0 hing's .
SFX 117 Y 1
SFX 117 0 ne .
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 0 ng .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 ni .
SFX 2399 Y 1
SFX 2399 0 nn .
SFX 739 Y 1
SFX 739 0 no .
SFX 3770 Y 1
SFX 3770 0 rymen's .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 0 ns .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 nt .
SFX 264 Y 1
SFX 264 0 ny .
SFX 3891 Y 1
SFX 3891 0 ntial .
SFX 1888 Y 1
SFX 1888 0 pa .
SFX 1690 Y 1
SFX 1690 0 pe .
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 0 alizers .
SFX 331 Y 1
SFX 331 0 ps .
SFX 3210 Y 1
SFX 3210 0 pt .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 py .
SFX 3579 Y 1
SFX 3579 0 worth .
SFX 4386 Y 1
SFX 4386 0 usly .
SFX 465 Y 1
SFX 465 0 ra .
SFX 938 Y 1
SFX 938 0 rd .
SFX 608 Y 1
SFX 608 0 re .
SFX 1131 Y 1
SFX 1131 0 ri .
SFX 3793 Y 1
SFX 3793 0 rm .
SFX 2708 Y 1
SFX 2708 0 rn .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 ro .
SFX 19 Y 1
SFX 19 0 rs .
SFX 1395 Y 1
SFX 1395 0 rt .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 ry .
SFX 3384 Y 1
SFX 3384 0 icity .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 ta .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 te .
SFX 192 Y 1
SFX 192 0 th .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 ti .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 to .
SFX 97 Y 1
SFX 97 0 ts .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 0 tt .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 ty .
SFX 3644 Y 1
SFX 3644 0 tz .
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 0 sor's .
