lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Romano/1638,2292
Sal/1,5,68,82,88,115,119,125,140,146,174,194,228,234,262,497,510,522,532,573,613,751,1109,1149,1150,1449,1454,1456,1633,2034,2469,2532,2566,3072,3254,3372,3475,3942,4445,4814,4914
Sand/1,9,12,14,16,18,21,31,53,61,75,100,105,106,133,146,158,465,533,636,758,889,976,1091,1168,1204,1619,1634,1635,1813,2488,2507,2737,3458,3459,4124,4146
Theodor/1,16,21,30,33,43,512
Tom/1,16,21,30,33,75,106,194,490,531,542,616,665,777,951,1141,1497,1559,2168,2421,2545,3014,4337
cap/1,2,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,26,35,68,94,101,109,113,114,152,156,186,206,236,299,322,349,376,410,436,463,502,504,505,507,521,569,604,657,743,767,781,878,894,1279,1369,1848,2086,2626,2663,2670,3064,3116,3127,3697,3728,4324,4325,4326,4382,4481,4583,4584,4585,4695
est/9,12,14,142,190,241,266,494,524,1674,2702,3368,3369,3370,3371,4427,4428,4429,4644
fur/1,2,10,18,27,31,37,46,49,52,100,103,105,118,160,179,184,711,815,816,851,878,1108,1130,1296,1398,1417,1563,1673,1677,1812,1866,1899,2080,2109,2114,2115,2382,2383,2642,2712,3165,3663,3664,3782,3800,4502,4863,4864,4865
grim/3,4,5,8,10,11,16,17,18,21,34,36,56,72,74,409,1709,1808,2273,2407,2573,2574,2575,2786,2788,3279,3837,3838,3848,3921,4563,4746,4757
hang/2,3,4,14,29,32,35,69,78,90,112,258,332,388,407,474,484,485,529,612,809,867,918,998,2562,3491,3545,3930,3931,4226,4907
hat/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,48,50,57,82,116,119,127,179,298,373,472,493,692,795,1383,2003,2237,2360,2534,2535,2544,3483,3515
las/2,3,8,9,12,14,16,26,48,57,76,82,97,116,119,149,209,401,447,479,487,500,568,596,934,1056,1200,1371,1472,1756,2674,3726
lie/2,6,13,15,27,40,71,183,201,218,276,392,549,719,1038,1045,1092,1270,1765,2305,2999,3042
mil/1,2,6,8,9,12,14,16,21,26,46,48,49,52,57,63,82,97,107,119,121,127,140,160,168,174,200,211,212,218,220,227,283,298,312,315,390,403,410,455,461,498,511,521,536,552,845,957,1340,1615,1722,1932,2439,2440,2449,2828,4026
mis/2,8,9,12,14,52,209,277,293,303,323,372,405,425,598,1026,1291,1292,1333,1387,1408,1494,1539,1578,1768,1852,1855,1881,2023,2248,2369,2370,2625,2669,2733,2791,2821,3123,3124,3141,3211,3223,3224,3331,3578,3645,3827,3828,4154,4586,4906
mistrust/2,3,4,9,12,108,165
moll/1,2,18,31,37,594,620,621,622,745,782,817
nave/1,2,49,107,160,163
overs/1249,2308,2640,3108,3109,3375,3376,3880,4087,4127,4469,4530,4531,4532,4740,4755
plum/1,2,3,4,8,16,18,21,34,36,109,113,167,185,195,207,221,251,260,277,331,409,462,466,542,582,628,693,695,764,1028,1139,1245,1425,1554,1560,1708,1709,1799,1903,2127,2155,2156,2377,2400,2772,2773,2786,2788,2950,2954,3227,3273,3749,3920,3921,4745,4889
portmanteau/1,2,525
rendezvous/1,3,4,8,39
rubber/1,2,3,4,18,34,36,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,2403,2783,3278,4880
run/2,8,16,21,26,43,63,97,151,157,208,210,258,264,287,289,313,337,379,410,450,485,498,506,519,521,585,600,632,643,649,738,769,810,822,879,1001,1024,1032,1037,1038,1263,1270,1423,1510,1552,1555,1705,1905,2045,2274,2576,2581,2999,3277,3934
she/1,2,6,9,13,14,83,145,152,156,171,197,201,215,224,283,296,297,454,476,481,484,551,563,598,918,993,1012,1145,1185,1598,1811,1815,2052,2275,2562,3318,3461,3545,3580,3586,4174,4187,4194,4653,4655,4720,4962
single/146,262,1116,1267,1630,1973,2073,2635,2636,2998,3410
solar/904,1158
striptease/1,2,6,7,13,15,19
sub/1,221,260,521,550,568,635,833,1091,1140,1314,1683,1721,2157,2499,2635,2636,2886,3000,3033,3099,3100,3234,3283,3603,3645,3646,3699,3945,3946,4038,4547,4573,4763,4764,4997
tab/1,2,46,52,88,100,105,118,125,153,221,233,247,260,312,339,410,498,521,651,773,895,926,1362,1363,1364,1365,1366,1367,1520,1521,1620,1833,1928,2815,2816,3634,3635,3636,3973,4798,4952
ton/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,18,21,25,28,34,36,43,117,131,135,138,140,174,208,227,254,276,434,512,565,643,697,1005,1245,2924,3119,3375,3376,3384,3478,3479,3701,3702,4087
uprise/13
wee/2,3,6,13,27,71,84,109,113,140,151,159,174,178,201,207,216,218,227,250,251,264,283,285,307,331,333,338,345,364,368,466,609,610,708,893,1134,1251,1423,1489,1555,1788,2182,2243,3492
who/1,30,68,88,153,179,184,194,280,285,290,381,608,735,937,1811,2275,2514,2674,3213,3327,3573,3725,4679,4988
